extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/tests/unit/data/circumfix.aff
# circumfixes: ~ obligate prefix/suffix combinations
# superlative in Hungarian: leg- (prefix) AND -bb (suffix)

CIRCUMFIX X

PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 leg/X .

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 legesleg/X .

SFX C Y 3
SFX C 0 obb . is:COMPARATIVE
SFX C 0 obb/AX . is:SUPERLATIVE
SFX C 0 obb/BX . is:SUPERSUPERLATIVE
